District of Columbia statutes.
16-2351

Purpose of the subchapter; construction of provisions.

(a)

The general purposes of this subchapter are to:

(1)

encourage stability in the lives of certain children who have been adjudicated neglected and have been removed from the custody of their parent by providing judicial procedures for the permanent termination of the parent and child relationship in the circumstances set forth in this subchapter;

(2)

ensure that the constitutional rights of all parties are recognized and enforced in all proceedings conducted pursuant to this subchapter while ensuring that the fundamental needs of children are not subjugated to the interests of others; and

(3)

increase the opportunities for the prompt adoptive placement of children for whom parental rights have been terminated.

(b)

This subchapter shall be liberally construed to promote the general purposes stated in this section.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 16-2351.
1973 Ed., § 16-2351.